Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 3 Teachers Retirement System of Georgia

Cross references.

Expenditure of public funds for retirement benefits and costs authorized, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. I.

Provision of supplemental pension and retirement allowances by governing boards of public school systems and by Board of Regents, §§

20-1-2

,

20-1-4

.

Health care plans for public school teachers, §

20-2-880

et seq.

Reimbursement of Department of Law by Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, for legal services, § 45-15-37.

Authority of municipalities to levy and collect property taxes for purpose of paying pensions and other benefits and costs under a teacher retirement system, §

48-5-351

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1623, proposed an amendment to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI adding subparagraph (c), regarding health insurance plans for retired former employees of public school systems.
This amendment was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election on November 4, 1986.